Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1911.02
Application; contents.

(1) An applicant for a license to operate a program required to be licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act shall file a written application with the department. The application shall be accompanied by the license fee pursuant to section 71-1911.01 and shall set forth the full name and address of the program to be licensed, the full name and address of the owner of such program, the names of all household members if the program is located in a residence, the names of all persons in control of the program, and additional information as required by the department, including affirmative evidence of the applicant's ability to comply with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. The application shall include the applicant's social security number if the applicant is an individual. The social security number shall not be public record and may only be used for administrative purposes.

(2) The application shall be signed by (a) the owner, if the applicant is an individual, a partnership, or the sole owner of a limited liability company or a corporation, (b) two of its members, if the applicant is a limited liability company, or (c) two of its officers, if the applicant is a corporation.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 71;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 99.